Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202438-1063
Application for examination.

No application for any type of licensure shall be considered complete unless all information requested in the application has been supplied, all seals and signatures required have been obtained, and all supporting and documentary evidence has been received by the department.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 49;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 82;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-388;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 325;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 17.